Vermont, session 2025-2026, H99.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. chapter 75 is added to read:
CHAPTER 75. EARNED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES
§ 2301. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) “Biometric data” means data generated from the technological
processing of an individual’s unique biological, physical, or physiological
characteristics that is linked or reasonably linkable to an individual, including:
(i) iris or retina scans;
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 2 of 17
(ii) fingerprints;
(iii) facial or hand mapping, geometry, or templates;
(iv) vein patterns;
(v) voice prints; and
(vi) gait or personally identifying physical movement or patterns.
(B) “Biometric data” does not include:
(i) a digital or physical photograph;
(ii) an audio or video recording; or
(iii) any data generated from a digital or physical photograph or
from an audio or video recording, unless such data is generated to identify a
specific individual.
(2) “Consumer” means an individual residing in this State.
(3) “Direct-to-consumer provider” means a provider that offers or
provides earned wage access services directly to consumers based on the
consumer’s representations and the provider’s reasonable determination of the
consumer’s earned but unpaid income.
(4) “Earned but unpaid income” means salary, wages, compensation, or
other income that an obligor owes but has not yet paid to a consumer, as
reasonably determined by a provider based on information provided by or on
behalf of a consumer or obligor.
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 3 of 17
(5) “Earned wage access services” means the business of delivering
proceeds to consumers prior to the next date on which an obligor is obligated
to pay salary, wages, compensation, or other income to a consumer.
(6) “Employer-integrated provider” means a provider that offers or
provides earned wage access services to a consumer using time and attendance
or earnings data for the relevant pay period that is provided directly or
indirectly by an obligor or a service provider of the obligor.
(7) “Licensee” means a provider who has been issued a license pursuant
to this chapter.
(8) “Obligor” means a person who is legally obligated to pay salary,
wages, compensation, or other income for work that a consumer performs on
an hourly, project-based, piecework, or other basis.
(9) “Outstanding proceeds” means proceeds transferred to a consumer
by a provider and not yet repaid to the provider.
(10)(A) “Precise geolocation data” means information derived from
technology that can precisely and accurately identify the specific location of a
consumer within a radius of 1,850 feet.
(B) “Precise geolocation data” does not include:
(i) the content of communications;
(ii) data generated by or connected to an advanced utility metering
infrastructure system; or
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 4 of 17
(iii) data generated by equipment used by a utility company.
(11) “Proceeds” means an amount of funds a provider transfers to a
consumer that is based on earned but unpaid income.
(12) “Provider” means a person who is in the business of offering and
providing earned wage access services to consumers.
§ 2302. LICENSE REQUIRED
(a) A person shall not provide earned wage access services in this State
without first obtaining a license pursuant to this chapter.
(b) A person, including a provider’s financial institution as defined in
subdivision 10202(5) of this title, but not including a consumer’s financial
institution as defined in subdivision 10202(5) of this title or an interbank
clearinghouse as defined in 9 V.S.A. § 2481w(a), shall not provide substantial
assistance to a provider if the person or the person’s authorized agent receives
notice from a regulatory, law enforcement, or similar governmental authority,
or knows, or consciously avoids knowing, from its normal monitoring and
compliance systems, that the provider is in violation of subsection (a) of this
section.
(c)(1) Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a financial institution,
as that term is defined in subdivision 10202(5) of this title, if the financial
institution is authorized by law to accept deposits and the deposits are federally
insured.
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 5 of 17
(2) A financial institution not required to obtain a license pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall otherwise be held to comply with the
provisions required of licensees set forth in this chapter.
§ 2303. APPLICATION FOR LICENSE
An applicant shall include in its application for a license under this chapter:
(1) a description of the earned wage access services that the applicant
seeks to provide in this State;
(2) a statement or indication whether the provider is an
employer-integrated provider or a direct-to-consumer provider, or both;
(3) a list of other states in which the applicant is licensed or registered to
provide earned wage access services;
(4) a description of the nature and amount of charges or fees that the
applicant may impose for earned wage access services;
(5) information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceedings
affecting the applicant or any person in control of the applicant; and
(6) any other information required by the Commissioner, including
through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.
§ 2304. LICENSEE REQUIREMENTS; TERMS OF SERVICE
(a) Basic services. A licensee shall make available to each consumer to
whom it offers earned wage access services a basic level of service that
provides a reasonable option to receive proceeds at no cost to the consumer,
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 6 of 17
consistent with any minimum requirements and standards the Commissioner
adopts by rule or order.
(b) Employer services and additional services.
(1) A licensee that is an employer-integrated provider may impose a
charge or fee on an obligor who contracts with the licensee in order to:
(A) offer basic earned wage access services pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section; or
(B) provide additional services to consumers who are employees or
contractors of the obligor.
(2) Subject to the requirements set forth in subdivision 2306(2) of this
title, a licensee may offer additional services that may be subject to the
following charges or fees:
(A) a charge or fee for the optional expedited delivery of proceeds; or
(B) a subscription or membership fee for a bona fide group of
services that includes earned wage access services.
(c) Optional gratuity. A licensee may solicit an optional gratuity from the
consumer before finalizing the payment of proceeds, provided that:
(1) the licensee complies with subdivision 2306(2) of this title;
(2) the licensee provides clear notice that a gratuity is optional;
(3) the licensee provides the consumer a clear and accessible option to
leave no gratuity; and
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 7 of 17
(4) to approve a gratuity, the consumer must affirmatively consent to
contributing the gratuity after entering a dollar amount or percentage value.
(d) Required disclosures.
(1) Before providing a consumer with earned wage access services, a
licensee shall provide the consumer with written or electronic notice of the
terms and conditions governing its earned wage access services, which the
licensee may include as part of its service contract. The notice shall:
(A) use language intended to be easily understood by a layperson;
(B) state that the Commissioner has jurisdiction over the earned wage
access services performed by the licensee;
(C) provide both a phone number and a website through which the
consumer can submit complaints about the licensee’s earned wage access
services to the Commissioner;
(D) state that basic earned wage access services are available at no
cost to the consumer; and
(E) specify the type and amount of charges and fees the licensee may
impose for additional earned wage access services.
(2) Any time a licensee offers or provides an additional earned wage
access service for which it imposes a charge or fee, the licensee shall comply
with any disclosure requirements and standards the Commissioner adopts by
rule or order.
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 8 of 17
(3) A licensee shall clearly show the unique identifier issued to it by the
Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry on its internet website,
on all solicitations and advertisements directed to consumers, and on any other
documents as the Commissioner requires by rule or order.
(e) Cancellation of service. A licensee that offers or provides earned wage
access services on a recurring basis or as part of a subscription service shall
allow a consumer to cancel participation in the service at any time without a
cancellation fee.
(f) Termination of service. If authorized by the licensee and consumer in
their service contract, a licensee may terminate service to a consumer who does
not repay outstanding proceeds or pay a charge or fee permitted by law.
(g) Reporting.
(1) The Commissioner shall require each licensee to submit to the
Commissioner an annual report that includes a summary of its earned wage
access services for the previous calendar year in a manner and a form as the
Commissioner may require.
(2) Biennially, beginning on January 15, 2027, the Commissioner shall
submit a report to the House Committee on Commerce and Economic
Development and the Senate Committee on Economic Development, Housing
and General Affairs that shall provide a summary of the regulation and activity
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 9 of 17
of earned wage access services using reports the Commissioner received
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
§ 2305. NONRECOURSE OBLIGATIONS; PERMISSIBLE COLLECTION
(a) Nonrecourse. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this
section, a licensee shall provide earned wage access services on a nonrecourse
basis and shall not attempt to collect payment of outstanding proceeds,
charges, or fees through any means, including in a civil action or proceeding in
any court, through arbitration or other alternative dispute resolution process, or
through any third-party actor.
(b) Permissible collection. A licensee may collect repayment of
outstanding proceeds, charges, or fees as follows:
(1) Payroll deduction.
(A) Pursuant to written agreements with the consumer and the
obligor, a licensee that is an employer-integrated provider may initiate an
obligor-facilitated payroll deduction, a direct payment to the provider by or on
behalf of an obligor, or an obligor-facilitated assignment of the outstanding
proceeds from the consumer’s next paycheck following the date proceeds were
paid.
(B) A licensee may not make more than four total attempts at a
payroll deduction, direct payment, or assignment pursuant to subdivision (A)
of this subdivision (1).
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 10 of 17
(2) Electronic transfer.
(A) A licensee may make as many as four attempts at an electronic
transfer of funds from a consumer’s depository account at a financial
institution if:
(i) the consumer consents to the repayment of outstanding
proceeds, charges, or fees through an electronic transfer;
(ii) the licensee provides prior notice of the date and the amount of
a transfer;
(iii) the licensee attempts a transfer only on the date and in the
amount specified in the notice;
(iv) the licensee complies with all requirements applicable to the
payment system it uses to make an electronic transfer, including any applicable
National Automated Clearinghouse Association rules; and
(v) the licensee uses reasonable care to avoid causing a consumer
to incur a fee or penalty for insufficient funds.
(B) A licensee who violates subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2)
shall reimburse a consumer for any fee or penalty the consumer incurs due to
the violation.
(3) Periodic invoice. A licensee may submit not more than three
periodic written invoices to a consumer for payment.
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 11 of 17
(4) Other means. A licensee may use other means of collection that the
Commissioner approves by rule or order.
(5) Misrepresentation; fraud. A licensee may collect outstanding
proceeds, charges, fees, and any other amounts available by law if a consumer
provided false information in the course of procuring earned wage access
services or received proceeds with the intent to defraud the provider.
§ 2306. PROHIBITED ACTS AND PRACTICES
A licensee shall not:
(1) impose or attempt to collect a charge, fee, penalty, or interest:
(A) for basic earned wage access services under subsection 2304(a)
of this title;
(B) for employer services or additional services if not otherwise
authorized under subsection 2304(b) of this title;
(C) for failure to repay outstanding proceeds or to pay any fee or
charge; or
(D) to defer the collection of outstanding proceeds beyond the
original schedule for collection;
(2) present fees authorized under subsection 2304(b) or voluntary
gratuities authorized under subsection 2304(c) as default options to a
consumer;
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 12 of 17
(3) condition the availability or terms of earned wage access services,
including the amount of proceeds and the frequency of payments, on:
(A) whether the consumer chooses optional additional services;
(B) the amount or type of charges or fees the consumer agrees to pay;
(C) a requirement that the consumer transfer ownership or control of,
or create a security interest in, the consumer’s property as security for the
repayment of outstanding proceeds; or
(D) a consumer’s credit report or credit score;
(4) sell, offer for sale, lease, share, or trade in exchange for anything of
value the biometric data or precise geolocation data of a consumer:
(A) to that consumer’s obligor; or
(B) to any person other than the consumer’s obligor, without having
first obtained the affirmative consent of the consumer;
(5) commit an unfair or deceptive act in commerce pursuant to 9 V.S.A.
chapter 63, including:
(A) making a false or deceptive statement or representation, or a
fraudulent misrepresentation, to a consumer, the Commissioner, or a
government agency;
(B) soliciting a consumer to delay repayment of outstanding proceeds
for the purpose of increasing the total charges or fees the licensee may collect;
and
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 13 of 17
(C) any act, practice, or conduct prohibited in connection with the
collection of, or attempt to collect, a debt arising out of a consumer transaction
under 9 V.S.A. § 2453(a) or any rule adopted by the Attorney General under
that subsection;
(6) report a consumer’s payment or failed repayment of proceeds or
payment of any fee or charge to a consumer reporting agency or debt collector;
(7) discriminate against a consumer on the basis of the sex, marital
status, race, color, religion, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender
identity, or disability of the consumer, provided that a licensee is not required
to do business with a consumer that lacks the legal capacity to contract due to
the consumer’s disability or minor age; or
(8) transfer proceeds to a consumer in virtual currency or in an
instrument denominated in virtual currency without the prior approval of the
Commissioner in a writing expressly referencing this subdivision, other than a
virtual currency issued or insured by the United States or its agency or
instrumentality.
§ 2307. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER STATE LAWS
The provision of earned wage access services by a licensee in accordance
with this chapter is not:
(1) a loan subject to chapter 73 of this title;
(2) a wage assignment under section 2234 or 2235 of this title;
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 14 of 17
(3) a money transmission subject to chapter 79 of this title;
(4) subject to 9 V.S.A. chapter 4; or
(5) a violation of or noncompliance with the laws of this State governing
deductions from payroll, salary, wages, compensation, or other income, or the
purchase, sale or assignment of, or an order for, earned but unpaid income.
§ 2308. RULES
The Commissioner may adopt rules and orders and issue specific rulings,
demands, and findings as are necessary for the administration and the
enforcement of this chapter and for the protection of consumers who obtain
earned wage access services in this State, including imposing limits and
requirements on the amount, type, and disclosure regarding earned wage
access services and charges or fees for services.
§ 2309. PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION; CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT
(a) A consumer may bring a private right of action for damages caused by a
violation of this chapter against a provider that was required to be licensed
under this chapter, but was not, at the time the provider offered or provided
earned wage access services to the consumer.
(b) The powers vested in the Commissioner by this chapter shall be in
addition to any other powers or rights of consumers or the Attorney General or
others under any other applicable law or rule, including the Vermont
Consumer Protection Act and any applicable rules adopted under that Act,
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 15 of 17
provided that the Commissioner’s determinations concerning the interpretation
and administration of the provisions of this chapter and any rules adopted
under this chapter shall carry a presumption of validity.
Sec. 2. 8 V.S.A. § 2102 is amended to read:
§ 2102. APPLICATION FOR LICENSE
(a) Application for a license or registration shall be in writing, under oath,
and in the form prescribed by the Commissioner, and shall contain the legal
name, any fictitious name or trade name, and the address of the residence and
place of business of the applicant;, and if the applicant is a partnership
corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity, the name
and title of each key individual and person in control of the applicant; or an
association, of every member thereof, and if a corporation, of each officer and
director thereof; also the county and municipality with street and number, if
any, where the business is to be conducted; and such further information as the
Commissioner may require.
(b) At the time of making an application, the applicant shall pay to the
Commissioner a fee for investigating the application and a license or
registration fee for a period terminating on the last day of the current calendar
year. The following fees are imposed on applicants:
* * *
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 16 of 17
(15) For an application for an earned wage access services provider
license under chapter 75 of this title, $1,000.00 as a license fee and $1,000.00
as an application and investigation fee.
* * *
Sec. 3. 8 V.S.A. § 2109 is amended to read:
§ 2109. ANNUAL RENEWAL OF LICENSE
(a) On or before December 1 of each year, every licensee shall renew its
license or registration for the next succeeding calendar year and shall pay to
the Commissioner the applicable renewal of license or registration fee. At a
minimum, the licensee or registree shall continue to meet the applicable
standards for licensure or registration. At the same time, the licensee or
registree shall maintain with the Commissioner any required bond in the
amount and of the character as required by the applicable chapter. The annual
license or registration renewal fee shall be:
* * *
(15) For an earned wage access services provider license under chapter
75 of this title, $1,200.00.
* * *
Sec. 4. 8 V.S.A. § 10202(5) is amended to read:
(5) “Financial institution” means a financial institution as defined in
subdivision 11101(32) of this title, and a credit union, financial institution
VT LEG #379692 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.99
2025 Page 17 of 17
subsidiary, licensed lender, mortgage broker, earned wage access services
provider, or sales finance company organized or regulated under the laws of
this State, the United States, or any other state or territory.
Sec. 5. IMPLEMENTATION; GRACE PERIOD
(a) The license requirement set forth in 8 V.S.A. § 2302 applies beginning
on January 1, 2026.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a person providing
earned wage access services in this State as of January 1, 2025 may continue
providing earned wage access services without a license through December 31,
2025, or until its application for a license is denied, if:
(1) the provider submits an application for a license before January 1,
2026; and
(2) the provider otherwise complies with 8 V.S.A. chapter 75.
(c) Solely for purposes of 8 V.S.A. § 2309(a), a provider that has complied
with subsection (b) of this section shall be deemed to be a licensee during the
grace period provided by subsection (b) of this section.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379692 v.1